output.aff
SFX T Y 191
SFX T   at          iam        [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          ias        [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          ia         [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          iame       [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          iate       [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          aju        [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          ajuc       [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          aj         [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          ajme       [cczrs]at
SFX T   at          ajte       [cczrs]at
SFX T   dat         dzem       dat
SFX T   dat         dzes       dat
SFX T   dat         dze        dat
SFX T   dat         dzeme      dat
SFX T   dat         dzete      dat
SFX T   dat         dzu        dat
SFX T   dat         dzuc       dat
SFX T   dat         dz         dat
SFX T   dat         dzme       dat
SFX T   dat         dzte       dat
SFX T   at          mem        jat
SFX T   at          mes        jat
SFX T   at          me         jat
SFX T   at          meme       jat
SFX T   at          mete       jat
SFX T   at          mu         jat
SFX T   at          muc        jat
SFX T   at          mi         jat
SFX T   at          mime       jat
SFX T   at          mite       jat
SFX T   lat         olem       klat
SFX T   lat         oles       klat
SFX T   lat         ole        klat
SFX T   lat         oleme      klat
SFX T   lat         olete      klat
SFX T   lat         olu        klat
SFX T   lat         oluc       klat
SFX T   lat         ol         klat
SFX T   lat         olme       klat
SFX T   lat         olte       klat
SFX T   slat        slem       slat
SFX T   slat        sles       slat
SFX T   slat        sle        slat
SFX T   slat        sleme      slat
SFX T   slat        slete      slat
SFX T   slat        slu        slat
SFX T   slat        sluc       slat
SFX T   slat        sli        slat
SFX T   slat        slime      slat
SFX T   slat        slite      slat
SFX T   at          em         [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          es         [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          e          [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          eme        [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          ete        [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          u          [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          uc         [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          i          [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          ime        [^ks]lat
SFX T   at          ite        [^ks]lat
SFX T   lat         lem        lat
SFX T   lat         les        lat
SFX T   lat         le         lat
SFX T   lat         leme       lat
SFX T   lat         lete       lat
SFX T   lat         lu         lat
SFX T   lat         luc        lat
SFX T   lat         li         lat
SFX T   lat         lime       lat
SFX T   lat         lite       lat
SFX T   at          i          [mn]at
SFX T   at          ime        [mn]at
SFX T   at          ite        [mn]at
SFX T   nat         niam       nat
SFX T   nat         nias       nat
SFX T   nat         nia        nat
SFX T   nat         niame      nat
SFX T   nat         niate      nat
SFX T   nat         naju       nat
SFX T   nat         najuc      nat
SFX T   nat         naj        nat
SFX T   nat         najme      nat
SFX T   nat         najte      nat
SFX T   sat         sem        sat
SFX T   sat         ses        sat
SFX T   sat         se         sat
SFX T   sat         seme       sat
SFX T   sat         sete       sat
SFX T   sat         su         i[aeiouy]sat
SFX T   sat         su         [^i][aeiouy]sat
SFX T   sat         suc        i[aeiouy]sat
SFX T   sat         suc        [^i][aeiouy]sat
SFX T   sat         s          sat
SFX T   sat         sme        sat
SFX T   sat         ste        sat
SFX T   tat         cem        tat
SFX T   tat         ces        tat
SFX T   tat         ce         tat
SFX T   tat         ceme       tat
SFX T   tat         cete       tat
SFX T   tat         cu         tat
SFX T   tat         cuc        tat
SFX T   tat         c          tat
SFX T   tat         cme        tat
SFX T   tat         cte        tat
SFX T   tat         tnem       tat
SFX T   tat         tnes       tat
SFX T   tat         tne        tat
SFX T   tat         tneme      tat
SFX T   tat         tnete      tat
SFX T   tat         tnu        tat
SFX T   tat         tnuc       tat
SFX T   tat         tni        tat
SFX T   tat         tnime      tat
SFX T   tat         tnite      tat
SFX T   at          iam        avat
SFX T   at          ias        avat
SFX T   at          ia         avat
SFX T   at          iame       avat
SFX T   at          iate       avat
SFX T   at          aju        avat
SFX T   at          ajuc       avat
SFX T   at          aj         avat
SFX T   at          ajme       avat
SFX T   at          ajte       avat
SFX T   at          em         [^a]vat
SFX T   at          es         [^a]vat
SFX T   at          e          [^a]vat
SFX T   at          eme        [^a]vat
SFX T   at          ete        [^a]vat
SFX T   at          u          [^a]vat
SFX T   at          uc         [^a]vat
SFX T   0           i          [^a]vat
SFX T   0           ime        [^a]vat
SFX T   0           ite        [^a]vat
SFX T   zat         zem        [hz]at
SFX T   zat         zes        [hz]at
SFX T   zat         ze         [hz]at
SFX T   zat         zeme       [hz]at
SFX T   zat         zete       [hz]at
SFX T   zat         zu         i[aeou][hz]at
SFX T   zat         zuc        i[aeou][hz]at
SFX T   zat         zu         [^i][aeou][hz]at
SFX T   zat         zuc        [^i][aeou][hz]at
SFX T   zat         zu         [aeiloruy][hz]at
SFX T   zat         zuc        [aeiloruy][hz]at
SFX T   zat         zu         [^aaeeiilooruuyy][hz]at
SFX T   zat         zuc        [^aaeeiilooruuyy][hz]at
SFX T   zat         z          [hz]at
SFX T   zat         zme        [hz]at
SFX T   zat         zte        [hz]at
SFX T   zat         znem       zat
SFX T   zat         znes       zat
SFX T   zat         zne        zat
SFX T   zat         zneme      zat
SFX T   zat         znete      zat
SFX T   zat         znu        zat
SFX T   zat         znuc       zat
SFX T   zat         zni        zat
SFX T   zat         znime      zat
SFX T   zat         znite      zat
SFX T   at          em         [^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          es         [^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          e          [^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          eme        [^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          ete        [^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          u          i[aeou][^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          u          [^i][aeou][^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          u          [aeiouy][^ccdzjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          u          [^aaeeioouuy][^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          uc         i[aeou][^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          uc         [^i][aeou][^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          uc         [aeiouy][^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          uc         [^aaeeioouuy][^ccdjlrssttvzz]at
SFX T   pat         p          pat
SFX T   at          me         [^ccdjmnrssttvzz]at
SFX T   at          te         [^ccdjmnrssttvzz]at
SFX T   pat         pnem       pat
SFX T   pat         pnes       pat
SFX T   pat         pne        pat
SFX T   pat         pneme      pat
SFX T   pat         pnete      pat
SFX T   pat         pnu        pat
SFX T   pat         pnuc       pat
SFX T   pat         pni        pat
SFX T   pat         pnime      pat
SFX T   pat         pnite      pat
SFX T   t           l          t
SFX T   t           la         t
SFX T   t           lo         t
SFX T   t           li         t
