output.dic
blabotat/NT
blbotat/NT
blikotat/NT
blkotat/NT
brblat/NT
brechat/NT
bzukotat/NT
capat/NT
cengotat/NT
cicat/NT
cucat/NT
cumlat/NT
cupotat/ENT
captat/ENT
cesat/NT
ciapat/NT
cicrat/NT
cliapat/NT
cuchrat/NT
curkotat/NT
cvachtat/ENT
cvikotat/NT
dlabat/NT
dlbat/NT
dobabrat/NT
dobat/NT
dodriapat/NT
dohrabat/NT
dohrkotat/NT
dohuzvat/NT
dochramat/NT
dojat/NT
dokazat/NT
doklat/NT
doklopat/NT
dokmasat/NT
doknisat/NT
dokopat/NT
dokrkvat/NT
dolamat/NT
domazat/NT
domotat/ENT
doorat/NT
dopisat/NT
dopratat/NT
doprat/NT
dorezat/NT
dorubat/NT
dorypat/NT
dostavat/NT
dosypat/NT
dosibat/NT
dosklbat/NT
doskrabat/NT
dosliapat/NT
dosmatlat/NT
dostipat/NT
dotat/NT
dotrepat/NT
dovecerat/NT
doviazat/NT
dozat/NT
drhnut/NT
driapat/NT
driemat/NT
drichmat/NT
drkotat/NT
drmat/NT
dubat/NT
dudlat/NT
dudrat/NT
dupat/NT
dupotat/NT
dzavotat/NT
frflat/NT
frfotat/NT
fufnat/NT
fukotat/NT
gagotat/NT
gaudzat/NT
gavdzat/NT
grcat/NT
habat/NT
hadzat/NT
hltat/ENT
hrabat/NT
hrkotat/NT
hrmotat/NT
hukotat/NT
hundrat/NT
hupat/NT
hybat/NT
chabrat/NT
chachotat/NT
chapat/NT
chechotat/NT
chichotat/NT
chlastat/ENT
chleptat/NT
chlipat/NT
chmatat/NTX
chniapat/NT
chrapat/NT
chrapotat/NT
chrupat/NT
chvastat/ENT
jagotat/ENT
kapat/NT
kaslat/NT
kaslat/NT
klamat/NT
klapat/NT
klat/NT
klepotat/NT
klopat/NT
klusat/NT
koktat/NT
kresat/NT
kupat/NT
kutrat/NT
lalotat/ENT
lapotat/ENT
liepat/NTX
luhat/ENT
macat/ENT
mekotat/NT
meridzat/NT
motat/ENT
mumlat/NT
nacarbat/NT
nadpisat/NT
nadviazat/NTX
nahltat/ENT
najat/NT
nakaslat/NT
nakopat/NT
namazat/NT
namotat/ENT
napasmat/NT
napratat/NT
nastavat/NT
naskrabat/NT
nastiepat/NT
navecerat/NT
navonat/NT
nazvat/NT
obecat/NT
obracat/NT
obsypat/NT
obvesat/NT
odhrabat/NT
odchrchlat/NT
odkaslat/NT
odklepat/NT
odmerat/NT
odoslat/NT
odpisat/NT
odrapotat/NT
odrezat/NT
odskrabat/NT
odvracat/NT
ofrflat/NT
ohundrat/NT
okaslat/NT
oklepat/NT
okresat/NT
olupat/NT
omotat/ENT
opasat/NTX
orezat/NT
osklbat/NT
osomrat/NT
otrepat/NT
ovonat/NT
ozvat/NT
paprat/NT
pisat/NT
pitvat/NT
plantat/NT
pocarbat/NT
podkasat/NT
podpisat/NT
podrmat/NT
podtat/NT
podumat/NT
podvracat/NT
pohrabat/NT
pohybat/NT
pochvastat/ENT
pokapat/NT
poklopat/NT
pokrkvat/NT
pomazat/NT
pomrmlat/NT
popaprat/NT
popratat/NT
porantat/NT
porozmetat/ENT
posibat/NT
poskrabat/NT
posomrat/NT
postipat/NT
potrepat/NT
povesat/NT
pozobat/NT
pozat/NT
praskotat/NT
precesat/NT
predriapat/NT
preklat/NT
prekopat/NT
premazat/NT
prenajat/NT
prepozicat/NT
prerezat/NT
preslopat/NT
presypat/NT
preskriabat/NT
pretat/NT
prezvat/NT
pricesat/NT
prijat/NT
primerat/NT
pripisat/NT
pristavat/NT
pritrepat/NT
privracat/NT
prplat/NT
rachotat/NT
rehotat/ENT
revat/NT
rozbabrat/NT
rozcaptat/ENT
rozdobat/NT
rozdubat/NT
rozhadzat/NT
rozhybat/NT
rozchichotat/ENT
rozkaslat/NT
rozklepat/NT
rozkmasat/NT
rozkolisat/NT
rozkutat/ENT
rozlamat/NT
rozmerat/NT
rozorvat/NT
rozostavat/NT
rozozat/NT
rozpisat/NT
rozpozicat/NT
rozrehotat/ENT
rozrezat/NT
rozrypat/NT
rozsypat/NT
rozskrabat/NT
rozsliapat/NT
rozstiepat/NT
roztrepat/NT
rozviazat/NT
rozvracat/NT
rubat/NT
sacat/NT
scupotat/NT
schabrat/NT
sipotat/NT
sklamat/NT
sklzat/NT
skopat/NT
skresat/NT
skuhrat/NT
spisat/NT
stat/NT
strebat/NT
strestat/ENT
sepotat/NT
sibat/NT
simrat/NT
skamrat/NT
skrabat/NT
skrekotat/NT
skripat/NT
sliapat/NT
snupat/NT
spintat/NT
splachtat/ENT
splechtat/ENT
stebotat/NT
stiepat/NT
strkotat/NT
stvat/NT
suchtat/ENT
supat/NT
susotat/NT
tapotat/ENT
tat/NT
tlkotat/NT
trepotat/ENT
trkotat/NT
tutlat/NT
ubabrat/NT
ujat/NT
ukolisat/NT
upisat/NT
usliapat/NT
utat/NT
uviazat/NT
vajatat/ENT
vesat/NT
viazat/NT
vlamat/NT
vorat/NT
vpisat/NT
vracat/NT
vstavat/NT
vsypat/NT
vyblabotat/ENT
vycucat/NT
vycesat/NT
vydobat/NT
vydupat/NT
vyhrabat/NT
vyjachtat/ENT
vykasat/NT
vykaslat/NT
vyklat/NT
vyklopat/NT
vykrapat/NT
vykupat/NT
vykutrat/NT
vylizat/NT
vymazat/NT
vymotat/ENT
vypiplat/NT
vypitvat/NT
vypratat/NT
vyrezat/NT
vyrvat/NT
vyslat/NT
vystavat/NT
vysibat/NT
vyskrabat/NT
vystipat/NT
vytat/NT
vytrestat/ENT
vyvracat/NT
vyzvat/NT
vyzobrat/NT
zabrechat/NT
zabuchotat/NT
zacesat/NT
zadrichmat/NT
zadupat/NT
zahrabat/NT
zahrmotat/NT
zahundrat/NT
zachichotat/ENT
zachrochtat/NT
zajat/NT
zakasat/NT
zakaslat/NT
zaklamat/NT
zaklepat/NT
zakloktat/ENT
zaknisat/NT
zakolisat/NT
zakresat/NT
zakyvotat/NT
zaluhat/NT
zamerat/NT
zamotat/ENT
zamumlat/NT
zapit/NTW
zapratat/NT
zarachotat/NT
zarehotat/ENT
zarezat/NT
zarypat/NT
zastavat/NT
zasklbat/NT
zaskriabat/NT
zasliapat/NT
zastrkotat/ENT
zasuchotat/ENT
zasuslat/NT
zatat/NT
zatrepotat/ENT
zavadzat/NT
zavonat/NT
zazobat/NT
zbabrat/NT
zdupotat/NT
zhabat/NT
zhrkotat/NT
ziapat/NT
zlizat/NT
zmazat/NT
zmotat/ENT
zoslat/NT
zoskrabat/NT
zosliapat/NT
zozat/NT
zrezat/NT
zrypat/NT
zvat/NT
zviazat/NT
zat/NT
zobrat/NT
